Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Article 7. No Obligation to Provide Services to Disposals of State Land; No Limitation on Further Disposals.

Sec. 38.95.300.
Disclaimer applicable to state land disposals.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, nothing in this title

obligates the state to provide services to land that is disposed of by the state, or any grantee of the state, or is the subject of any disposal program;

limits the authority of the state to dispose of land or any interest in land or resources in the area of the current disposal, provides any exclusive right or interest in the area of the disposal, or implies or requires that any disposals made will be limited in type or any other manner.

History.

(§ 37 ch 91 SLA 1997)